Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4410
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Good Life District Economic Development Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Allocated sales taxes means state sales taxes on or after October 1, 2025, that are allocated by the Tax Commissioner to the city in which all or a portion of the good life district is located pursuant to subsection (2) of section 77-4413;

(2) Bond has the same meaning as in section 10-134;

(3) City means any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, city of the first class, city of the second class, or village, including any city operated under a home rule charter;

(4) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(5) Election means any general election, primary election, or special election called by the city as provided by law;

(6) Eligible costs means payment and reimbursement of (a) the costs of acquisition, planning, engineering, designing, financing, construction, improvement, rehabilitation, renewal, replacement, repair, landscaping, irrigation, and maintenance of privately and publicly owned real estate, buildings, improvements, fixtures, equipment, and other physical assets within a good life district and debt service on such real estate, buildings, improvements, fixtures, equipment, and other physical assets, (b) the costs of construction and acquisition of publicly owned infrastructure and publicly owned property rights within or related to a good life district, (c) costs of and related to the public right-of-way, including streets, signage, lighting, refuse services, and landscaping, (d) the costs of new technology assets, including hardware, software, and related intellectual property, (e) the costs of marketing and tenant improvement allowances, and (f) city costs related to implementing, operating, and funding a good life district economic development program;

(7) Good life district means any good life district established pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act;

(8) Good life district applicant means (a) the person who applied for the applicable good life district, which was approved by the department pursuant to section 77-4405 and (b) any related person as defined in section 77-4403;

(9) Good life district economic development program or program means a program established pursuant to the Good Life District Economic Development Act to utilize funds derived from local sources of revenue for the purpose of paying eligible costs, and for paying principal of and interest on bonds issued pursuant to the act;

(10) Good life district program area means the area established pursuant to section 77-4412 for a good life district economic development program;

(11) Good life district retailer has the same meaning as in section 77-4403;

(12) Governing body means the city council, board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the city;

(13) Local sources of revenue means the sources of revenue established for a good life district economic development program pursuant to section 77-4413, and any revenue generated from grants, donations, or state and federal funds received by the city for such good life district economic development program subject to any restrictions of the grantor, donor, or state or federal law;

(14) Nonrevenue producing costs means eligible costs paid from the good life district economic development program for (a) construction or acquisition of privately owned real and personal property which is not expected to generate local sources of revenue for the program through the use of such property in the operation of one or more businesses located in the good life district program area or (b) operating expenses or other noncapital expenditures of a qualifying business which is not a governmental entity;

(15) Project area has the same meaning as in section 77-4403;

(16) Project area applicant has the same meaning as in section 77-4403; and

(17)(a) Qualifying business means any corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship which owns or leases property or operates its business within a good life district program area, or plans to own or lease property or operate its business within a good life district program area. The term includes a related person as defined in section 77-4403.

(b) Qualifying business shall also include a political subdivision, a state agency, or any other governmental entity which includes any portion of the good life district program area within its territorial boundaries.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB707, § 9.

Good Life Transformational Projects Act, see section 77-4401.